Massachusetts, session 194th, H4336.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17Z the following new section:-
Section 17AA. The group insurance commission and any carrier as defined in section 1
of chapter 176O or other entity which contracts with the commission to provide health benefits
to eligible employees and retirees and their eligible dependents shall not decline to provide
coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services solely on the basis that those services
were delivered by a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in
a mobile integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to
chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved
mobile integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were
provided in a health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of
payments for otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services
were delivered by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
care program. A contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a
of 7

deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care
provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the
deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance
applicable to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended in section 2 by adding the following subsection:-
(c) MIH programs that are focused on behavioral health services shall not be subject to
application and registration fees.
SECTION 3. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10Z the following new section:-
Section 10AA. The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization, the Medicaid primary care clinician
plan, or an accountable care organization shall not decline to provide coverage for medical,
behavioral or health care services solely on the basis that those services were delivered by a
health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated
health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O.
Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated
health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care
facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered
services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care
provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that
of 7

provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or
coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care provider participating in an
approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the deductible, copayment or
coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of
the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 4. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting before
section 47CCC the following new section:-
Section 47AAA. Any blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A),
(C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently renewed by
agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the commonwealth,
during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of accident or sickness
insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides hospital expense and
surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or subsequently renewed
by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the commonwealth, during the period
within which this provision is effective, or any employers' health and welfare fund which
provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and which is issued or renewed to any
person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the period within which this provision
is effective, shall not decline to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services
solely on the basis that those services were delivered by a health care provider, as defined in
section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated health care program approved by
the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral or health care
services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated health care program shall be covered
to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care facility, as defined in section 1 of
of 7

chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on
the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care provider participating in an
approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that provides coverage for care
delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a
service provided by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
care program as long as the deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the
deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of the same services within a health
care facility.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8DDD the following new section:-
Section 8EEE. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall not decline to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by
a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile
integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter
111O. Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile
integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a
health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for
otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered
by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A
contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible,
copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care provider
participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the deductible,
of 7

copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable
to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4DDD the following new section:-
Section 4EEE. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall not decline to provide
coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by a health care provider, as
defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated health care program
approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral or
health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated health care program shall
be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care facility, as defined in
section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered services shall not be
reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care provider participating
in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that provides coverage for care
delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a
service provided by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
care program as long as the deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the
100 deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of the same services within a health
101 care facility.
102 SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
103 section 4VV the following new section:-
of 7

104 Section 4WW. Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or
105 renewed shall not decline to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services
106 delivered by a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a
107 mobile integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to
108 chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral, or health care services delivered by way of an approved
109 mobile integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were
110 provided in a health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of
111 payments for otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services
112 were delivered by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
113 care program. A contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a
114 deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care
115 provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the
116 deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance
117 applicable to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
118 SECTION 8. Chapter 176I of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after
119 section 13 the following new section:-
120 Section 14. An organization entering into a preferred provider contract shall not decline
121 to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by a health care
122 provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated health care
123 program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O. Medical,
124 behavioral, or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated health care
125 program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care facility, as
126 defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered services
of 7

127 shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care provider
128 participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that provides
129 coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or coinsurance
130 requirement for a service provided by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile
131 integrated health care program as long as the deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not
132 exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of the same services
133 within a health care facility.
of 7